parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/ITALIAN/FST2/src/lex-organizations.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8
!# CONTENT:     country names, capitals and demonyms
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:    ITALIAN
!#
!# AUTHOR:      A. Schiller, G. Depau
!#
!# CREATED:	14-May-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# sources:
!# [E] http://publications.europa.eu/code/it/it-5000500.htm
!# [W] Wikipedia
!# ============================================================================
Multichar_Symbols

+Prop +Org

+Soc
+Sport
+Inst
+Prod
+Company
+Postmod
+Acron

+Sg +Pl +SP
+Masc +Fem +MF

! special markers
(.)	! optional dot
(-)	! optional hyphen
[-]	! hyphen or ce


!# ========================================================================
!# continuation classes
LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	XSG	+MF+Sg		#;

LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;
LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;

LEXICON XSP	+MF+SP		#;	! invariant

LEXICON ROOT 
S.a.s.+Prop+Company+Postmod+Acron			FSG;
S.a.p.a.+Prop+Company+Postmod+Acron			FSG;
ADUC+Prop+Org					FSG;
Altroconsumo+Prop+Org				MFSGPL;
Associazione% Consumatori% Utenti+Prop+Org	FSG;
IntesaConsumatori+Prop+Org			FSG;
Associazione% Italiana% Società% Concessionarie% Autostrade% e% Trafori+Prop+Org			FSG;
Confartigianato+Prop+Org				FSG;	
Confcommercio+Prop+Org				FSG;
Confederazione% Nazionale% dell'Artigianato% e% della% Piccola% e% Media% Impresa%+Prop+Org	FSG;
Giovani% imprenditori+Prop+Org			FSG;
Camera% di% Commercio% Italiana+Prop+Org		FSG;
Assocomunicazione+Prop+Org				FSG;
Istituto% del% Gelato% Italiano+Prop+Org		FSG;
CGIL-CISL-UIL+Prop+Org					XSG;
CGIL+Prop+Org						XSG;
CISL+Prop+Org						XSG;
UIL+Prop+Org						XSG;
INPS+Prop+Org						FSG;
World% travel% and% tourism% council%+Prop+Org		MSG;
Amateur% Athletic% Union+Prop+Sport						FSG;
Atlantic% Coast% Conference+Prop+Sport					FSG;
Big% East% Conference+Prop+Sport						FSG;
Federazione% Ciclistica% Italiana+Prop+Sport					FSG;
Federazione% Internazionale% di% Orientamento+Prop+Sport			FSG;
Federazione% Internazionale% Canoa% Kayak+Prop+Sport				FSG;
Federazione% Internazionale% Sport% Orientamento+Prop+Sport			FSG;
Federazione% Internazionale% Golf+Prop+Sport					FSG;
Federazione% Italiana% Hockey% e% Pattinaggio+Prop+Sport			FSG;
Federazione% Italiana% Judo% Lotta% Karate% Arti% Marziali+Prop+Sport	FSG;
National% Collegiate% Athletic% Association+Prop+Sport			FSG;
Federazione% Italiana% Scherma+Prop+Sport					FSG;
Federazione% Italiana% Sci% Nautico+Prop+Sport				FSG;
Federazione% Italiana% Sport% Equestri+Prop+Sport				FSG;
Federazione% Italiana% Sport% del% Ghiaccio+Prop+Sport			FSG;
Federazione% Italiana% Taekwondo+Prop+Sport					FSG;
Federazione% Italiana% Vela+Prop+Sport					FSG;
Federazione% calcistica% dell'Asia% orientale+Prop+Sport			FSG;
Federazione% calcistica% dell'ASEAN+Prop+Sport				FSG;
CONCACAF+Prop+Sport								FSG;
CONMEBOL+Prop+Sport								MSG;
UEFA+Prop+Sport								FSG;
Confederazione% Calcistica% Italiana+Prop+Sport				FSG;
Uefa+Prop+Sport								FSG;
Ministero% dell’Economia% e% delle% Finanze+Prop+Inst			MSG;
Ministero% degli% affari% esteri+Prop+Inst				MSG;
Ministero% della% giustizia+Prop+Inst					MSG;
Ministero% per% lo% sviluppo% economico+Prop+Inst			MSG;
Ministero% della% solidarietà% sociale+Prop+Inst			MSG;
Ministero% delle% politiche% agricole% e% forestali+Prop+Inst		MSG;
Ministero% dell'ambiente% e% della% tutela% del% territorio+Prop+Inst	MSG;
Ministero% dei% trasporti%+Prop+Inst					MSG;
Ministero% per% i% beni% e% le% attività% culturali+Prop+Inst		MSG;
Ministero% del% commercio% internazionale+Prop+Inst			MSG;
Camera% dei% Deputati+Prop+Inst						FSG;
Senato% della% Repubblica+Prop+Inst					MSG;
Camera+Prop+Inst							FSG;
Parlamento% europeo+Prop+Inst						MSG;
Commissione% europea+Prop+Inst						FSG;
Consiglio% europeo+Prop+Inst						MSG;
Corte% di% giustizia% europea+Prop+Inst					FSG;
Unicef+Prop+Inst							XSG;
Unesco+Prop+Inst							MSG;
Nazioni% Unite+Prop+Inst						FPL;
OLP+Prop+Inst								FSG;
G8+Prop+Inst								MSG;
OPEC+Prop+Inst								FSG;
Polizia% Municipale+Prop+Inst						FSG;
Interpol+Prop+Inst							FSG;
Fiamme% Gialle+Prop+Inst						FPL;
Sismi+Prop+Inst								MSG;
Vigili% del% fuoco+Prop+Inst						MPL;
Sacra% corona% unita+Prop+Org						MSG;
Consiglio% Nazionale% delle% Ricerche+Prop+Inst				MSG;
Ente% per% le% Nuove% tecnologie,% l’Energia% e% l’Ambiente+Prop+Inst	MSG;
Istituto% Nazionale% di% Economia% Agraria+Prop+Inst			MSG;
Istituto% Nazionale% di% Ricerca% per% gli% Alimenti% e% la% Nutrizione+Prop+Inst	MSG;
Istituto% di% Studi% e% Analisi% Economica+Prop+Inst			MSG;
Istituto% per% lo% Sviluppo% dei% Lavoratori+Prop+Inst			MSG;
Istituto% Superiore% di% Sanità+Prop+Inst				MSG;
Greenpeace+Prop+Org		XSG;
P2+Prop+Org			FSG;
Rotary% Club+Prop+Org		MSG;
Pdci+Prop+Org						XSG;
Hamas+Prop+Org						XSG;
Idv+Prop+Org						XSG;
MSI+Prop+Org						MSG;
PD+Prop+Org						MSG;
PPI+Prop+Org						MSG;
Psdi+Prop+Org						MSG;
PSI+Prop+Org						MSG;
BR+Prop+Org						FPL;
Forza% Italia+Prop+Org					FSG;
Movimento% Sociale+Prop+Org				MSG;
Movimento% Sociale% Italiano-Destra% Nazionale+Prop+Org		MSG;
Partito% Liberale% %Italiano+Prop+Org			MSG;	
Partito% Socialista% Italiano+Prop+Org			MSG;	
Partito% d'Azione+Prop+Org				MSG;		
Partito% Repubblicano% Italiano+Prop+Org			MSG;		
Alleanza% Monarchica+Prop+Org				MSG;	
Civiltà% Mediterranea+Prop+Org				MSG;	
Destra% Liberale% Italiana+Prop+Org			MSG;	
Federazione% dei% Liberali% Italiani+Prop+Org		MSG;	
Fiamma% Tricolore+Prop+Org				MSG;	
Fronte% Sociale% Nazionale+Prop+Org			MSG;	
Il% Loto+Prop+Org					MSG;	
La% mia% Italia+Prop+Org				MSG;	
Movimento% Fascismo% e% Libertà+Prop+Org		MSG;	
No% Euro+Prop+Org					MSG;	
Unione% consumatori+Prop+Org				MSG;	
Nuovo% Partito% d'Azione+Prop+Org			MSG;	
Partito% Comunista% Internazionalista+Prop+Org		MSG;	
Partito% dell'Alleanza+Prop+Org				MSG;	
Partito% d'Azione% Liberalsocialista+Prop+Org		MSG;	
Partito% dei% Socialdemocratici+Prop+Org		MSG;	
Partito% Liberale% Italiano+Prop+Org			MSG;	
Partito% Pensionati+Prop+Org				MSG;	
Pensionati% Uniti+Prop+Org				MSG;	
Polo% Civico% di% Centro+Prop+Org			MSG;	
Progetto% Popolare% Europeo+Prop+Org			MSG;	
Radicali% di% sinistra+Prop+Org				MSG;	
Solidarietà+Prop+Org					MSG;	
Partito% per% il% SUD+Prop+Org				MSG;	
Partito% dei% Comunisti% Italiani+Prop+Org		MSG;	
Sinistra% Democratica+Prop+Org				MSG;	
La% Destra+Prop+Org					MSG;	
Sinistra% Critica+Prop+Org				MSG;	
Partito% della% Libertà+Prop+Org			MSG;	
Movimento% Indipendentista% Ligure+Prop+Org		MSG;	
Liga% Fronte% Veneto+Prop+Org				MSG;	
Autonomie% Liberté% Démocratie+Prop+Org			MSG;	
Renouveau% Valdôtain+Prop+Org				MSG;	
Union% Valdôtaine+Prop+Org				MSG;	
Fronte% Nazionale% Siciliano+Prop+Org			MSG;	
Movimento% per% l'Indipendenza% della% Sicilia+Prop+Org		MSG;	
Movimento% per% l'Autonomia+Prop+Org			MSG;
Partito% del% Sud+Prop+Org				MSG;	
Partito% Sardo% d'Azione+Prop+Org			MSG;	
Sardigna% Natzione% Indipendentzia+Prop+Org		MSG;
A% Manca% pro% s'Indipendentzia+Prop+Org		MSG;	
Lega% per% l'autonomia% Alleanza% Lombarda%+Prop+Org	MSG;	
Cittadini% per% il% Presidente+Prop+Org			MSG;	
Lista% per% Trieste+Prop+Org				MSG;	
Slovenska% Skupnost+Prop+Org				MSG;	
Die% Freiheitlichen+Prop+Org				MSG;	
Süd-Tiroler% Freiheit+Prop+Org				MSG;	
Union% für% Südtirol+Prop+Org				MSG;	
Il% Popolo% della% Libertà+Prop+Org			MSG;	
AN+Prop+Org						MSG;	
Lega% Nord+Prop+Org					MSG;	
Partito% Repubblicano% Italiano+Prop+Org		MSG;	
Partito% socialista% europeo+Prop+Org			FSG;
Zanu[-]Pf+Prop+Org					MSG;
Acqua% Marcia+Prop+Soc		FSG;
Agusta+Prop+Soc			FSG;		
AT&T+Prop+Soc			FSG;
BMW+Prop+Soc			FSG;
CARIPLO+Prop+Soc		FSG;
Coca% Cola+Prop+Soc		FSG;
Esso+Prop+Soc			FSG;
Ford+Prop+Soc			FSG;
Hilton+Prop+Soc			MSG;
IBM+Prop+Soc			FSG;
Kodak+Prop+Soc			FSG;
Mercedes+Prop+Soc		FSG;
Monte% dei% Paschi+Prop+Soc	FSG;
Olivetti+Prop+Soc		FSG;
Philips+Prop+Soc		FSG;
Renault+Prop+Soc		FSG;
Sheraton+Prop+Soc		MSG;
Standa+Prop+Soc			FSG;
Telecom+Prop+Soc		XSG;
Toyota+Prop+Soc			FSG;
Aer% Lingus+Prop+Soc			FSG;
Aliadriatica+Prop+Soc			FSG;
Blue% Panorama% Airlines+Prop+Soc	FSG;
Italian% Air% Force+Prop+Soc		FSG;
Meridiana+Prop+Soc			FSG;
Victoria% Airlines+Prop+Soc		FSG;
National% Jets% Italy+Prop+Soc		FSG;
Air% Sicilia+Prop+Soc			FSG;
Unifly+Prop+Soc				FSG;
Air% Industria+Prop+Soc			FSG;
Federico% II% Airways+Prop+Soc		FSG;
MyAir+Prop+Soc				FSG;
Air% Sal+Prop+Soc			FSG;
Voliamo+Prop+Soc			FSG;
A.B.I.+Prop+Soc+Acron				FSG;
Banca% Mondiale+Prop+Soc			FSG;
Poste% Italiane+Prop+Soc			FSG;
Sanpaolo+Prop+Soc				FSG;
Montepaschi+Prop+Soc				FSG;
Banca% Nazionale% del% Lavoro+Prop+Soc		FSG;
Banca% Popolare% di% Lodi+Prop+Soc		FSG;
Carige+Prop+Soc					FSG;
Banco% di% Brescia+Prop+Soc			FSG;
Banca% Popolare% di% Vicenza+Prop+Soc		FSG;
Cassa% di% Risparmio% di% Parma% e% Piacenza+Prop+Soc	FSG;
Banca% Regionale% Europea+Prop+Soc		FSG;
Credito% Industriale% Sardo+Prop+Soc		FSG;
